West Virginia, session 2026, SB280.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5C. Authorization for Department of health facilities to promulgate legislative rules. §64-5C-1. Department of Health Facilities. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §27-5-9 of this code, relating to the Department of Health Facilities (patient rights at state-operated mental health facilities, 64 CSR 59), is authorized.